fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-AI-DerXXX_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - various -  adsf : # Verbal derivations

     # AI -> II: Pass with -makan
     nipâw+V+AI+Der/Pass+V+II+Ind+3Sg: nipâmakan
     PV/ê+nipâw+V+AI+Der/Pass+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: ê-nipâmakahk
     mâham+V+AI+Der/Pass+V+II+Ind+3Sg: mâhâmakan
     PV/ê+mâham+V+AI+Der/Pass+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: ê-mâhâmakahk

     # AI -> AI: Hab with -ski
     nipâw+V+AI+Der/Hab+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: nipâskiw
     nipâw+V+AI+Der/Hab+V+AI+Ind+1Sg: ninipâskin
     PV/ê+nipâw+V+AI+Der/Hab+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: ê-nipâskit
     PV/ê+nipâw+V+AI+Der/Hab+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg: ê-nipâskiyân

     # AI -> TI: Trans with -st
     atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Trans+V+TI+Ind+3Sg: atoskêstam
     atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Trans+V+TI+Ind+1Sg: nitatoskêstên
     PV/ê+atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Trans+V+TI+Cnj+3Sg: ê-atoskêstahk
     PV/ê+atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Trans+V+TI+Cnj+1Sg: ê-atoskêstamân

     # AI -> TA: Bnf with -staw
     atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: atoskêstawêw
     atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO: nitatoskêstawâw
     atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO: kitatoskêstâtin
     atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kitatoskêstawin

     # AI -> TA: Caus with -h
     atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Caus+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: atoskêhêw
     atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Caus+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO: nitatoskêhâw
     atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Caus+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO: kitatoskêhitin

     ## Nominalization

     # AI -> NI: Nom with -(amo)win
     nipâw+V+AI+Der/Nom+N+I+Sg: nipâwin
     nipâw+V+AI+Der/Nom+N+I+Px1Pl+Pl: ninipâwininâna
     atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Nom+N+I+Sg: atoskêwin
     atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Nom+N+I+Px1Pl+Pl: nitatoskêwininâna
     mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Nom+N+I+Sg: mîcisowin
     mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Nom+N+I+Px1Pl+Pl: nimîcisowininâna
     pimisin+V+AI+Der/Nom+N+I+Sg: pimisiniwin
     pimisin+V+AI+Der/Nom+N+I+Px1Pl+Pl: nipimisiniwininâna
     mâham+V+AI+Der/Nom+N+I+Sg: mâhâmowin
     mâham+V+AI+Der/Nom+N+I+Px1Pl+Pl: nimâhâmowininâna

     # AI -> NI: Nom2 with -n
     nipâw+V+AI+Der/Nom2+N+I+Sg: nipân
     nipâw+V+AI+Der/Nom2+N+I+Px1Pl+Pl: ninipâninâna
     atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Nom2+N+I+Sg: atoskân
     atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Nom2+N+I+Px1Pl+Pl: nitatoskâninâna
     mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Nom2+N+I+Sg: mîcison
     mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Nom2+N+I+Px1Pl+Pl: nimîcisoninâna
     mâham+V+AI+Der/Nom2+N+I+Sg: mâhên
     mâham+V+AI+Der/Nom2+N+I+Px1Pl+Pl: nimâhêninâna

     # AI -> NI: Ins2 with  -âkan
     nipâw+V+AI+Der/Ins2+N+I+Sg: nipâkan
     nipâw+V+AI+Der/Ins2+N+I+Px1Pl+Pl: ninipâkaninâna
     atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Ins2+N+I+Sg: atoskâkan
     atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Ins2+N+I+Px1Pl+Pl: nitatoskâkaninâna
     mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Ins2+N+I+Sg: [ mîciswâkan, mîcisowâkan ]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Ins2+N+I+Px1Pl+Pl:  [ nimîciswâkaninâna, nimîcisowâkaninâna ]
     mâham+V+AI+Der/Ins2+N+I+Sg: mâhâkan
     mâham+V+AI+Der/Ins2+N+I+Px1Pl+Pl: nimâhâkaninâna

     ## Agentive forms
     # Agentive o- ... -(amo)w
     nipâw+V+AI+Der/Age+N+A+Sg: onipâw
     nipâw+V+AI+Der/Age+N+A+Px1Pl+Pl: nitônipâwinânak
     atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Age+N+A+Sg: otatoskêw
     atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Age+N+A+Px1Pl+Pl: nitôtatoskêwinânak
     mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Age+N+A+Sg: omîcisow
     mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Age+N+A+Px1Pl+Pl: nitômîcisowinânak
     pimisin+V+AI+Der/Age+N+A+Sg: opimisiniw
     pimisin+V+AI+Der/Age+N+A+Px1Pl+Pl: nitôpimisinînânak
     mâham+V+AI+Der/Age+N+A+Sg: omâhamow
     mâham+V+AI+Der/Age+N+A+Px1Pl+Pl: nitômâhamônânak

     # Complex forms
     atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Trans+V+TI+Ind+3Sg: atoskêstam
     PV/wîci+atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [ wîci-atoskêmêw, wîtatoskêmêw ]
     atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Trans+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: atoskêscikêw
     atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Trans+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Pass+V+II+Ind+3Sg: atoskêscikêmakan
     atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Trans+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Caus+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: atoskêscikêhêw
     atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Trans+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Caus+V+TA+Der/Goa+N+A+Sg: atoskêscikêhâkan
     atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Trans+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: atoskêscikêstawêw
     atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Trans+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Der/Goa+N+A+Sg: atoskêscikêstawâkan
     atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Trans+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Der/Rflx+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: atoskêscikêstâsow
     atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Trans+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Der/Rflx+V+AI+Der/Nom+N+I+Sg: atoskêscikêstâsowin
     atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Trans+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Der/Rcpr+V+AI+Ind+3Pl: atoskêscikêstâtowak
     atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Trans+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Der/Rcpr+V+AI+Der/Nom+N+I+Pl: atoskêscikêstâtowina

     # Diminutives
     atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Dim+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: acoskêsiw
     PV/wîci+atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Der/Dim+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [ wîci-acoskêmêsiw, wîcacoskêmêsiw ]
     atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Dim+V+AI+Der/Trans+V+TI+Ind+3Sg: acoskêsistam
     atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Trans+V+TI+Der/Dim+V+TI+Ind+3Sg: acoskêscasiw
     # Dim: AI + Trans -> TI + Antip -> AI + Bnf -> TA
     atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Dim+V+AI+Der/Trans+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: acoskêsiscikêscawêsiw
     atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Trans+V+TI+Der/Dim+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: acoskêscasîkêscawêsiw
     atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Trans+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Dim+V+AI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: acoskêscikêsiscawêsiw
     atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Trans+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Der/Dim+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: acoskêscikêscawêsiw
     # Dim: AI + Trans -> TI + Antip -> AI + Bnf -> TA + Rflx -> AI
     atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Dim+V+AI+Der/Trans+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Der/Rflx+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: acoskêsiscikêstâsow
     atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Trans+V+TI+Der/Dim+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Der/Rflx+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: acoskêscasîkêstâsow
     atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Trans+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Dim+V+AI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Der/Rflx+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: acoskêscikêsistâsow
     atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Trans+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Der/Rflx+V+AI+Der/Dim+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: acoskêscikêscâsosiw
     # Dim: AI + Trans -> TI + Antip -> AI + Bnf -> TA + Rflx -> AI + Nom -> NI
     atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Trans+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Der/Rflx+V+AI+Der/Nom+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Sg: [ acoskêscikêscâsowinis, acoskêscikêscâsowinisis ]
     # Dim: AI + Trans -> TI + Antip -> AI + Bnf -> TA + Rcpr -> AI
     atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Dim+V+AI+Der/Trans+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Der/Rcpr+V+AI+Ind+3Pl: acoskêsiscikêstâtowak
     atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Trans+V+TI+Der/Dim+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Der/Rcpr+V+AI+Ind+3Pl: acoskêscasîkêstâtowak
     atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Trans+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Dim+V+AI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Der/Rcpr+V+AI+Ind+3Pl: acoskêscikêsistâtowak
     atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Trans+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Der/Rcpr+V+AI+Der/Dim+V+AI+Ind+3Pl: acoskêscikêscâcosiwak
     # Dim: AI + Trans -> TI + Antip -> AI + Bnf -> TA + Rcpr -> AI + Nom -> NI
     atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Trans+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Der/Rcpr+V+AI+Der/Nom+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Pl: [ acoskêscikêscâcowinisa, acoskêscikêscâcowinisisa ]
